Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.093

Subpoenas.

The commission has the power to subpoena witnesses and to issue subpoenas for the production of any books, records, or documents of any kind for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

[ 2002 c 313 s 85.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.